Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.073

Licenses—Inactive status—Fees.

Any physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed under this chapter not practicing physical therapy or providing services may place his or her license in an inactive status. The board shall prescribe requirements for maintaining an inactive status and converting from an inactive or active status. The secretary may establish fees for alterations in license status.

[ 2007 c 98 s 9; 1998 c 143 s 1.]